Massachusetts, session 194th, S2260.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 321 of chapter 94 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definitions of “Beverage” and “Beverage
container” and inserting in place thereof the following two definitions:-
“Beverage”, soda water or similar carbonated soft drinks, mineral water, alcoholic
beverages sold in a miniature and beer and other malt beverages, but shall not include alcoholic
beverages other than beer and malt beverages as defined in chapter 138 and alcoholic beverages
sold in a miniature, dairy products, natural fruit juices or wine.
“Beverage container”, any sealable bottle, can, jar, or carton which is primarily composed
of glass, metal, plastic or any combination of those materials and is produced for the purpose of
of 2

containing a beverage, including a miniature. This definition shall not include containers made of
biodegradable material.
SECTION 2. Said section 321 of said chapter 94 is hereby further amended by inserting
after the definition of “Label” the following definition:-
“Miniature”, any sealable bottle, can, jar, or carton which is primarily composed of glass,
metal, plastic, or any combination of those materials that has a capacity of not more than 100
milliliters and is produced for the purpose of containing an alcoholic beverage.
of 2